District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

1-307.23

Eligibility requirements.

Expired.

Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-155, § 4, 33 DCR 4809
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2182(b), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 136, 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 1-308.3.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction.
Section 17 of D.C. Law 17-63 repealed this section as of the date when the District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company becomes operational.
Section 19(b) of D.C. Law 17-63 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Expiration of Law 6-155

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-307.21.

Repeal of Part B: Section 16 of D.C. Law 17-196 provided: “The Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986, effective September 23, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.21 et seq.), is repealed as of the date when the Agency becomes operational.”